Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Article 3. Arson Reporting Immunity Act.

§ 27-85.3.
Short title.

This article shall be known as the Arson Reporting Immunity Act.

History.

1979, c. 279.

§ 27-85.4.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

“Action”
includes nonaction or the failure to take action.

“Authorized agencies”
means:

The chief or director of any municipal or county fire or police department or the sheriff of any county;

The arson investigator of the State Police Department; the Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms Division of the United States Department of the Treasury; or

The attorney for the Commonwealth or other person responsible for prosecutions in the jurisdiction where the fire occurred.“Insurance company” includes the Virginia Property Insurance Association.

History.

1979, c. 279; 1985, c. 58; 2008, c. 410.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 410 inserted “or director” in clause i.

§ 27-85.5.
Disclosure of information.

Any authorized agency may, in writing, require an insurance company to release to the requesting agency any or all relevant information or evidence deemed material by the requesting agency in the insurance company’s possession relating to the fire loss in question. Relevant information may include, but shall not be limited to:

Pertinent insurance policy information relevant to a fire loss under investigation and any application for such a policy;

Policy premium payment records;

History of previous claims made by the insured;

Material relating to the investigation of the loss, including statements of any person, proof of loss, and any other evidence relevant to the investigation.

When an insurance company has reason to believe that a fire loss in which it has an interest may be of other than accidental cause, then, for the purpose of notification and for having such fire loss investigated, the company shall, in writing, notify an authorized agency and provide it with any or all material developed from the company’s inquiry into the fire loss.
B. 1. When an insurance company has reason to believe that a fire loss in which it has an interest may be of other than accidental cause, then, for the purpose of notification and for having such fire loss investigated, the company shall, in writing, notify an authorized agency and provide it with any or all material developed from the company’s inquiry into the fire loss.

When an insurance company provides any one of the authorized agencies with notice of a fire loss, it shall be sufficient notice for the purpose of this article.

The authorized agency provided with information pursuant to subsections A or B of this section and in furtherance of its own purposes, may release or provide such information to any of the other authorized agencies.

Any insurance company providing information to an authorized agency or agencies pursuant to subsections A or B of this section shall have the right to request relevant information and receive, within a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty days, the information requested.

Any insurance company, or person acting in its behalf or authorized agency who releases information, whether oral or written, pursuant to subsections A or B of this section shall be immune from any liability arising out of a civil action, or penalty resulting from a criminal prosecution unless actual malice on the part of the insurance company or authorized agency is present.

History.

1979, c. 279.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

§ 27-85.6.
Evidence.

Any authorized agency and insurance company described in §

27-85.4

or §

27-85.5

who receives any information furnished pursuant to this article, shall hold the information in confidence until such time as its release is required pursuant to a criminal or civil proceeding, except release in accordance with subsection C of §

27-85.5

.

History.

1979, c. 279.